Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3 EMISSIONS INSPECTION
42-4-310. Periodic emissions control inspection required.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section, a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in the program area shall not be sold, registered for the first time without a certification of emissions compliance, or reregistered unless the vehicle has passed a clean screen test or has a valid certification of emissions control as required by the appropriate county. The provisions of this subsection (1)(a) do not apply to motor vehicle transactions at wholesale between motor vehicle dealers licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44. An inspection is not required prior to the sale of a motor vehicle with at least twelve months remaining before the vehicle's certification of emissions compliance expires if the certification was issued when the vehicle was new.
(1) (a) (I) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in the program area shall not be sold, registered for the first time without a certification of emissions compliance, or reregistered unless the vehicle has passed a clean screen test or has a valid certification of emissions control as required by the appropriate county. The provisions of this subsection (1)(a) do not apply to motor vehicle transactions at wholesale between motor vehicle dealers licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44. An inspection is not required prior to the sale of a motor vehicle with at least twelve months remaining before the vehicle's certification of emissions compliance expires if the certification was issued when the vehicle was new.

If title to a roadworthy motor vehicle, as defined in section 42-6-102 (15), for which a certification of emissions compliance or emissions waiver must be obtained pursuant to this paragraph (a) is being transferred to a new owner, the new owner may require at the time of sale that the prior owner provide said certification as required for the county of residence of the new owner.

The new owner shall submit such certification to the department of revenue or an authorized agent thereof with application for registration of the motor vehicle.

If such vehicle is being registered in the program area for the first time, the owner shall obtain any certification required for the county where registration is sought and shall submit such certification to the department of revenue or an authorized agent thereof with such owner's application for the registration of the motor vehicle. A motor vehicle being registered in the program area for the first time may be registered without an inspection or certification if the vehicle has not yet reached its fourth model year or a later model year established by the commission pursuant to section 42-4-306 (8)(b).

Except for a motor vehicle that was registered as a collector's item before September 1, 2009, and meets the requirements of sections 42-12-101 (2)(b) and 42-12-404 (2), to be sold or transferred or to renew the registration, a 1976 or newer model motor vehicle registered as a collector's item under article 12 of this title must be inspected and have a certification of emissions control. The certification of emissions control is valid for sixty months.

Repealed.
(b) (I) (A) Repealed.

New motor vehicles owned by the United States government or an agency thereof or by the state of Colorado or any agency or political subdivision thereof that would be registered in the program area shall be issued a certification of emissions compliance without inspection that shall expire on the anniversary of the day of the issuance of such certification when such vehicle has reached its fourth model year or a later model year established by the commission pursuant to section 42-4-306 (8)(b). Prior to the expiration of such certification such vehicle shall be inspected and a certification of emissions control shall be obtained therefor.

Effective May 28, 1999, 1982 and newer model motor vehicles that are owned by the United States government or an agency thereof or by the state of Colorado or any agency or political subdivision thereof that would be registered in the program area shall be inspected every two years, and shall be issued a certification of emissions compliance that shall be valid for twenty-four months; except that vehicles owned or operated by any agency or political subdivision that is authorized and licensed pursuant to section 42-4-309 to inspect fleet vehicles shall be inspected annually.

Effective May 28, 1999, 1981 and older model motor vehicles that are owned by the United States government or an agency thereof or by the state of Colorado or any agency or political subdivision thereof that would be registered in the program area shall be inspected once each year, and shall be issued a certification of emissions compliance that shall be valid for twelve months.

Any vehicle subject to this subparagraph (I) that is suspected of having an emissions problem may undergo a voluntary inspection as provided in subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of this subsection (1).

Motor vehicle dealers shall purchase verification of emissions test forms for the sum of twenty-five cents per form from the department or persons authorized by the department to make such sales to be used only on new motor vehicles. No refund or credit shall be allowed for any unused verification of emissions test forms. New motor vehicles required under this section to have a verification of emissions test form shall be issued a certification of emissions compliance without inspection, which shall expire on the anniversary of the day of the issuance of such certification when such vehicle has reached its fourth model year or a later model year established by the commission pursuant to section 42-4-306 (8)(b). Prior to the expiration of such certification such vehicle shall pass a clean screen test or be inspected and a certification of emissions control shall be obtained therefor.

1982 and newer model motor vehicles required pursuant to this section to have a certification of emissions control shall be inspected at the time of the sale or transfer of any such vehicle and, prior to registration renewal, shall be issued a certification of emissions control that shall be valid for twenty-four months except as provided under section 42-4-309. An inspection is not required prior to the sale of a motor vehicle with at least twelve months remaining before the vehicle's certification of emissions compliance expires if such certification was issued when the vehicle was new. This sub-subparagraph (B) does not apply to the sale of a motor vehicle that is inoperable or otherwise cannot be tested in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department of revenue if the seller of the motor vehicle provides a written notice to the purchaser pursuant to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

1981 and older model motor vehicles required pursuant to this section to have a certification of emissions control shall be inspected at the time of the sale or transfer of any such vehicle and, prior to registration renewal, shall be issued a certification of emissions control that shall be valid for twelve months. This sub-subparagraph (C) does not apply to the sale of a motor vehicle which is inoperable or otherwise cannot be tested in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department of revenue if the seller of the motor vehicle provides a written notice to the purchaser pursuant to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

Upon registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle required to have a certification of emissions control, the department shall issue a tab identifying the vehicle as requiring certification of emissions control. The tab shall be displayed from the time of registration. The verification of emissions test shall also be displayed on the motor vehicle in a location prescribed by the department of revenue consistent with federal regulations.

Effective October 1, 1989, those motor vehicles owned by nonresidents who reside in either the basic or enhanced emissions program areas or by residents who reside outside the program area who are employed for at least ninety days in any twelve-month period in a program area or who are attending school in a program area, and are operated in either the basic or enhanced emissions program areas for at least ninety days, shall be inspected as required by this section and a valid certification of emissions compliance or emissions waiver shall be obtained as required for the county where said person is employed or attends school. Such nonresidents include, but are not limited to, all military personnel, temporarily assigned employees of business enterprises, and persons engaged in activities at the Olympic training center.

Any person owning or operating a business and any postsecondary educational institution located in a program area shall inform all persons employed by such business or attending classes at such institution that they are employed or attending classes in a program area and are required to comply with the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c).

Vehicles that are registered in a program area and are being operated outside such area but within another program area shall comply with all program requirements of the area where such vehicles are being operated. Vehicles registered in a program area that are being temporarily operated outside the state at the time of registration or registration renewal may apply to the department of revenue for a temporary exemption from program requirements. Upon return to the program area, such vehicles must be in compliance with all requirements within fifteen days. A temporary exemption shall not be granted if the vehicle will be operated in an emissions testing area in another state unless proof of emissions from that area is submitted.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent or shall be interpreted so as to hinder the voluntary inspection of any motor vehicle in the enhanced emissions program. A certificate of emissions control issued under the provisions of the enhanced emissions program shall be acceptable as a demonstration of compliance within the basic program for vehicle registration purposes. In order to provide motorist protection, those vehicles voluntarily inspected and that fail said inspection but that are warrantable under manufacturers' emissions control warranties pursuant to section 207 (A) and (B) of the federal act shall comply with the emissions-related repair requirements of this part 3.

Motor vehicles operated in the enhanced emissions program area, and required to be inspected pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c), shall comply with the inspection requirements of the enhanced emissions program area and are not required to comply with the inspection requirements of the basic emissions program area.

Repealed.

For the basic emissions program, effective January 1, 1994, for businesses which operate nineteen or fewer motor vehicles and for 1981 or older private motor vehicles required to be registered in the basic emissions program area, after any adjustments or repairs required pursuant to section 42-4-306, if total expenditures of at least seventy-five dollars have been made to bring the vehicle into compliance with applicable emissions standards and the vehicle still does not meet such standards, a certification of emissions waiver shall be issued for such vehicle.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 246, § 11, effective August 10, 2011.)

Repealed.

For the basic emissions program, effective January 1, 1994, for businesses that operate nineteen or fewer vehicles and for private motor vehicles only of a model year 1982 or later required to be registered in the basic emissions program area, after any adjustments or repairs required pursuant to section 42-4-306, if total expenditures of at least two hundred dollars have been made to bring the vehicle into compliance with the applicable emissions standards and the vehicle still does not meet such standards, a certification of emissions waiver shall be issued for such vehicle. For vehicles not older than two years or that have not more than twenty-four thousand miles, or such period of time and mileage as established for warranty protection by amendments to federal regulations, no emissions-related repair waivers shall be issued due to the provisions and enforcement of section 207 (A) and (B) of the federal act relating to emissions control systems components and performance warranties. Vehicles that are owned by the state of Colorado or any agency or political subdivision thereof are not eligible for emissions-related repair waivers under this subparagraph (IV).

Repealed.

For the enhanced emissions program, effective January 1, 1995, for businesses that operate nineteen or fewer vehicles and for private motor vehicles only of a model year 1968 and later required to be registered in the enhanced emissions program area, after any adjustments or repairs required pursuant to section 42-4-306, if total expenditures of at least four hundred fifty dollars have been made to bring the vehicle into compliance with applicable emissions standards and the vehicle does not meet such standards, a certification of emissions waiver shall be issued for such vehicle except as prescribed in subparagraph (XII) of this paragraph (d) pertaining to vehicle warranty. The four-hundred-fifty-dollar minimum expenditure may be adjusted annually by an amount not to exceed the percentage, if any, by which the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPIU) for the Denver-Boulder metropolitan statistical area for the preceding year differs from such index for 1989. Vehicles that are owned by the state of Colorado or any agency or political subdivision thereof are not eligible for emissions-related repair waivers under this subparagraph (VI).

Repealed.

For the enhanced emissions program except as provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (VIII), for businesses that operate nineteen or fewer vehicles and for private motor vehicles only of a model year 1967 or earlier required to be registered in the enhanced emissions program area, after any adjustments or repairs required under section 42-4-306, if total expenditures of at least seventy-five dollars have been made to bring the vehicle into compliance with applicable emissions standards and the vehicle still does not meet the standards, a certification of emissions waiver shall be issued for the vehicle.

This subparagraph (VIII) shall apply in Boulder county, effective July 1, 1995.

For the enhanced emissions program except as provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (IX) effective January 1, 1995, for vehicles subject to a transient, loaded mode dynamometer inspection procedure under the enhanced program as determined by the commission, a certificate of waiver may be issued by an authorized state representative, if after failing a retest, at which point the minimum repair cost limit of four hundred fifty dollars has not been met, a complete and documented physical and functional diagnosis of the vehicle performed at an emissions technical center indicates that no additional emissions-related repairs would be effective or needed.

This subparagraph (IX) shall apply in Boulder county, effective July 1, 1995.

Subject to the provisions of subparagraph (V) of this paragraph (d), a certificate of emissions control shall not be issued for vehicles in the program area exhibiting smoke or indications of tampering with or poor maintenance of emissions control systems including on-board diagnostic systems.

As used in this paragraph (d), "total expenditures" means those expenditures directly related to adjustment or repair of a motor vehicle to reduce exhaust or evaporative emissions to a level which complies with applicable emissions standards. The term does not include an inspection fee, or any costs of adjustment, repair, or replacement necessitated by the disconnection of, tampering with, or abuse of air pollution control equipment, improper fuel use, or visible smoke.

No certification of emissions waiver shall be issued for vehicles not older than two years or which have not more than twenty-four thousand miles, or are of such other age and mileage as established for warranty protection under the federal act in accordance with the provisions and enforcement of section 207 (A) and (B) of the federal act relating to emissions control component and systems performance warranties.

The emissions inspection required under this section shall include an analysis of tail pipe and evaporative emissions. After January 1, 1994, such inspection shall include an analysis of emissions control equipment including on-board diagnostic systems, chlorofluorocarbons, and visible smoke emissions for the basic emissions program area and the enhanced emissions program area and emissions testing that meets the performance standards set by federal requirements for the enhanced emissions program area by means of procedures specified by regulation of the commission to determine whether the motor vehicle qualifies for issuance of a certification of emissions compliance. For motor vehicles of the model year 1975 or later, not tested under a transient load on a dynamometer, said inspection shall also include a visual inspection of emissions control equipment pursuant to rules of the commission.

Repealed.

In the basic emissions program area, effective January 1, 1994, in order to be issued a certificate of emissions waiver, appropriate adjustments and repairs must have been performed at a licensed inspection and readjustment station by a licensed emissions mechanic.

In the enhanced emissions program area, effective January 1, 1995, in order to be issued a certificate of emissions waiver, appropriate adjustments and repairs must have been performed by a technician at a registered repair facility within the enhanced emissions program area.

Adjustments and repairs performed by a registered repair facility and technician within the enhanced emissions program area shall be sufficient for compliance with the provisions of this paragraph (d) in the basic program area.

Effective July 1, 1993, any home rule city, city, town, or county shall, after holding a public hearing and receiving public comment and upon request by the governing body of such local government to the department of public health and environment and the department of revenue and after approval by the general assembly acting by bill pursuant to paragraph (e) of this subsection (3), be included in the program area established pursuant to sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316. When such a request is made, said departments and governing body shall agree to a start-up date for the program in such area, and, on or after such date, all motor vehicles, as defined in section 42-4-304 (18), which are registered in the area shall be inspected and required to comply with the provisions of sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto as if such area was included in the program area. Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (3), the department of public health and environment and the department of revenue, the executive director, and the commission shall perform all functions and exercise all powers related to the program in areas included in the program pursuant to this subsection (3) that they are otherwise required to perform under sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316.

Effective July 1, 1993, notwithstanding the provisions of section 42-4-304 (20), a local government with jurisdiction over an area excluded from the program area pursuant to section 42-4-304 (20) may request inclusion in the program area, and the exclusion under section 42-4-304 (20) shall not apply to vehicles registered within such area.

Effective July 1, 1993, the inclusion pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (3) of any home rule city, city, town, or county in the program area shall not be submitted to the United States environmental protection agency as a revision to the state implementation plan or otherwise included in such plan. Any governing body which requests inclusion of an area pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (3) in the program area may, after a minimum period of five years, request termination of the program in such area, and the program in such area shall be terminated thirty days after the receipt by the department of revenue of such a request.

Effective January 1, 1994, except for those entities included within the program area pursuant to section 42-4-304 (20), for inclusion in the program area, any home rule city, city, town, or county shall have the basic emissions program test requirements and standards implemented as its emissions inspection program.

Unless a home rule city, city, town, or county violates national ambient air quality standards as established by the environmental protection agency, the inclusion pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (3) of any home rule city, city, town, or county in the program area shall be contingent upon approval by the general assembly acting by bill to include any such home rule city, city, town, or county in the program area.

The seller of a motor vehicle that is inoperable or otherwise cannot be tested in accordance with rules promulgated by the department of revenue or that is being sold pursuant to part 18 or part 21 of this article is not required to obtain a certification of emissions control prior to the sale of the vehicle if the seller provides a written notice to the purchaser prior to completion of the sale that clearly indicates the following:

The vehicle does not currently comply with the emissions requirements for the program area;

The seller does not warrant that the vehicle will comply with emissions requirements; and

The purchaser is responsible for complying with emissions requirements prior to registering the vehicle in the emissions program area.

The department shall prepare a form to comply with the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) and shall make such form available to dealers and other persons who are selling motor vehicles which are inoperable or otherwise cannot be tested in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department of revenue.

If a motor vehicle is exempted from the requirement for obtaining a certification of emissions control prior to sale pursuant to this subsection (4), the new owner of the motor vehicle is required to obtain a certification of emissions control for such motor vehicle before registering it in the program area.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any eligible motor vehicle registered in a clean screen program county that complies with the requirements of the clean screen program under the provisions of sections 42-4-305 (12), 42-4-306 (23), and 42-4-307 (10.5)(a), by passing the requirements of such program and applicable rules shall be deemed to have complied with the inspection requirements of this section for the applicable emissions inspection cycle. For purposes of this subsection (5), "eligible motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle, including trucks, for model years 1978 and earlier having a gross vehicle weight rating of six thousand pounds or less and for model years 1979 and newer having a gross vehicle weight rating of eight thousand five hundred pounds or less.

If the commission does not specify a date for authorized agents in the basic emissions program area to begin collecting emissions inspection fees at the time of registration pursuant to section 42-3-304 (19)(a), or if the contractor determines that a motor vehicle required to be registered in the basic program area has complied with the inspection requirements pursuant to this subsection (5), a notice shall be sent to the owner of the vehicle identifying the owner of the vehicle, the license plate number, and other pertinent registration information, and stating that the vehicle has successfully complied with the applicable emission requirements. The notice must also include a notification that the registered owner of the vehicle may return the notice to the authorized agent with the payment as set forth on the notice to pay for the clean screen program. The receipt of the payment from the motor vehicle owner is notice that the motor vehicle has complied with the inspection requirements pursuant to this subsection (5).

For vehicles with registration renewals coming due on or after the dates specified by the commission for authorized agents to collect emissions inspection fees at the time of registration, if the contractor determines that a motor vehicle required to be registered in the program area has complied with the inspection requirements pursuant to this subsection (5), the contractor shall send a notice to the department of revenue identifying the owner of the vehicle, the license plate number, and any other pertinent registration information, stating that the vehicle has successfully complied with the applicable emission requirements.

The department shall, by contract with a private vendor or by rule, establish a procedure for a vehicle owner to obtain the necessary emissions-related documents for the registration and operation of a vehicle that has complied with the inspection requirements pursuant to this subsection (5).

Source:

L. 94:

(3)(a) amended, p. 2812, § 588, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2297, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(d)(VI), (1)(d)(X), and (3)(b) amended, p. 954, § 10, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1010, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(b)(II)(B), and (1)(b)(II)(C) amended and (4) added, p. 230, § 2, effective April 10; (5) added, p. 893, § 5, effective May 26.

L. 99:

(1)(b)(I), (1)(d)(IV), and (1)(d)(VI) amended, p. 951, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2001:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(b)(II)(A), (1)(d)(VI), (5)(b), and (5)(c) amended, p. 1019, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 2002:

(5)(a) and (5)(b) amended, pp. 969, 966, §§ 6, 2, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(b)(I)(B), (1)(b)(II)(A), and (1)(b)(II)(B) amended, p. 1603, § 4, effective August 6; (1)(a)(I), IP(4)(a), and (4)(c) amended, p. 2186, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(5)(b)(I) amended, p. 1175, § 14, effective August 8; (1)(a)(II)(C) and (1)(c)(III) amended, p. 715, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b)(II)(A) amended, p. 1028, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(d)(II)(B) and (1)(d)(VIII)(A) amended, (SB 09-003), ch. 322, p. 1718, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(d)(II)(B) and (1)(d)(VIII)(A) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 246, § 11, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(1)(a)(II)(D) added, (HB 13-1071), ch. 370, p. 2161, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(a)(II)(D) amended, (HB 14-1056), ch. 23, p. 154, § 1, effective March 7.

L. 2016:

(1)(b)(I)(A) repealed, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 797, § 120, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2066, § 53, effective July 1; (5)(b) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 372, § 21, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 142, § 19, effective October 1.

42-4-311. Operation of inspection and readjustment stations - inspection-only facilities - fleet inspection stations - motor vehicle dealer test facilities - enhanced inspection centers.

No inspection and readjustment station license, inspection-only facility license, fleet inspection station license, motor vehicle dealer test facility license, or enhanced inspection center contract may be assigned or transferred or used at any other than the station, facility, or center therein designated, and every such license or authorization for an enhanced inspection center shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the facility designated.

Beginning January 1, 1995, no emissions inspector license or authorization shall be assigned or transferred except to a licensed inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or enhanced inspection center.

No emissions inspector or emissions mechanic license or authorization may be assigned or transferred, nor shall the inspection and adjustment be made by such emissions inspector or emissions mechanic except at a licensed inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or motor vehicle dealer test facility or authorized enhanced inspection center.

A licensed inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, motor vehicle dealer test facility, or authorized enhanced inspection center shall not issue a certification of emissions control to a motor vehicle except upon forms prescribed by the executive director. Such station, facility, or center shall not issue a certification of emissions compliance or emission waiver unless the licensed or authorized emissions inspector or emissions mechanic performing the inspection determines that:

The exhaust gas and, if applicable, evaporative emissions from the motor vehicle comply with the applicable emissions standards and there is no evidence of emissions system tampering nor visible smoke, in which case a certification of emissions compliance shall be issued;

The exhaust gas and, if applicable, evaporative emissions from the motor vehicle do not comply with the applicable emissions standards after the adjustments and repairs required by section 42-4-306 have been performed and there is no evidence of emissions system tampering or visible smoke, in which case a certification of emissions waiver shall be issued. A fleet emission inspector shall not issue a certification of emissions waiver within the enhanced program area.

A verification of emissions test shall be issued to a motor vehicle by a licensed inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or motor vehicle dealer test facility or authorized enhanced inspection center at the time such vehicle is issued a certification of emissions control.
(3) (a) (I) A verification of emissions test shall be issued to a motor vehicle by a licensed inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or motor vehicle dealer test facility or authorized enhanced inspection center at the time such vehicle is issued a certification of emissions control.

Except as required by section 42-12-404, no verification of emissions test is required to be issued to or required for any motor vehicle that is registered as a collector's item under section 42-12-401.

Repealed.

Commencing July 1, 2001, every inspection and readjustment station, fleet inspection station, and inspection-only facility shall monthly transmit to the department the sum of twenty-five cents per motor vehicle inspection performed by such entity pursuant to this part 3 if the motor vehicle passes such inspection or is granted a waiver. No refund or credit shall be allowed for any unused verification of emissions test forms.

The contractor shall monthly transmit to the department the sum of twenty-five cents per motor vehicle inspection performed by the contractor pursuant to this part 3 if the motor vehicle passes such inspection or is granted a waiver. No refund or credit shall be allowed for any unused verification of emissions test forms.

The moneys collected by the department from the sale of verification forms shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such moneys to the AIR account, which account is created within the highway users tax fund. Moneys from the AIR account, upon appropriation by the general assembly, shall be expended only to pay the costs of administration and enforcement of the automobile inspection and readjustment program by the department and the department of public health and environment.

A licensed inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, or motor vehicle dealer test facility shall charge a fee not to exceed fifteen dollars for the inspection of vehicles, model year 1981 and older, at facilities licensed or authorized within either the basic or enhanced emissions program; except that for 1982 model and newer vehicles a test facility may charge a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars.
(4) (a) (I) A licensed inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, or motor vehicle dealer test facility shall charge a fee not to exceed fifteen dollars for the inspection of vehicles, model year 1981 and older, at facilities licensed or authorized within either the basic or enhanced emissions program; except that for 1982 model and newer vehicles a test facility may charge a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars.

In no case shall any such fee exceed the maximum fee established by and posted by the station or facility pursuant to section 42-4-305 (5) for the inspection of any motor vehicle required to be inspected under section 42-4-310.

A licensed emissions inspection and readjustment station shall charge a fee for performing the adjustments or repairs required for issuance of a certification of emissions waiver not to exceed the maximum charge established in section 42-4-310 and posted by the station pursuant to section 42-4-305.

The fee charged in paragraph (a) of subsection (4) or subsection (6) of this section will be charged to all nonresident vehicle owners subject to the inspection requirement of section 42-4-310 and depending on the county of operation.

The fee charged for enhanced emissions inspections performed within the enhanced emissions program area on 1982 and later motor vehicles shall not be any greater than that determined by the contract and in no case greater than twenty-five dollars. The fee charged for clean screen inspections performed on vehicles registered in the basic area shall not be any greater than that determined by the contract and in no case greater than fifteen dollars. Such fee shall not exceed the maximum fee required to be posted by the enhanced inspection center pursuant to section 42-4-305 for the inspection of any motor vehicle required to be inspected under section 42-4-310.

During the two-year renewal of the contract entered into pursuant to section 42-4-307 (10), the commission shall hold a hearing to determine the maximum fee that may be charged pursuant to the contract for inspections during any subsequent renewal term. The maximum fee must be based on estimated actual operating costs during the life of the contract, determined pursuant to the proceeding, plus a percentage to be determined by the commission, not to exceed ten percent and not to exceed twenty-five dollars.

Repealed.

At least one free reinspection shall be provided for those vehicles initially failed at the inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, or enhanced inspection center which conducted the initial inspection, within ten calendar days of such initial inspection.

Source:

L. 94:

(3)(b) amended, p. 2813, § 589, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2304, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

(3)(a)(III), (4)(a), and (6) amended, p. 1020, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 2002:

(4)(a) and (6)(a) amended, p. 967, § 3, effective June 1; (4)(a) amended, p. 1285, § 1, effective September 1; (4)(a) amended, p. 968, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 2006:

(6)(c) added, p. 1029, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

IP(2), (2)(b), and (3)(a)(II) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 246, § 12, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(6)(c) repealed, (SB 12-034), ch. 107, p. 365, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(3)(a)(II) amended, (HB 13-1071), ch. 370, p. 2161, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(6)(b) amended, (HB 17-1005), ch. 8, p. 24, § 4, effective August 9.